hunspell/new_xal.dic
аң/AdBd
яман/AdBd
һосн/AdBd
махн/AdBd
альхн/AdBd
арсн/AdBd
аран/AdBd
харан/AdBd
санан/AdBd
дун/AdBd
он/AdBd
чон/AdBd
цан/AdBd
зун/AdBd
зан/AdBd
оон/AdBd
хун/AdBd
школ/AdBd
аав/AdBd
шанз/AdBd
комсомол/AdBd
яңһг/AdBd
шаң/AdBd
шарнуд/AdBd
авлач/AdBd
ахлач/AdBd
ноха/AdBd
арата/AdBd
богшурһа/AdBd
богшада/AdBd
ааҗа/AdBd
шаһа/AdBd
така/AdBd
даалу/AdBd
дава/AdBd
моомрху/AdBd
нойрху/AdBd
залу/AdBd
аху/AdBd
буһу/AdBd
шанзч/AdBd
шанһч/AdBd
шаңнгч/AdBd
шаһавч/AdBd
шаһач/AdBd
ааһч/AdBd
авач/AdBd
авгч/AdBd
авлач/AdBd
шатагч/AdBd
авлһч/AdBd
аврач/AdBd
автомеханикч/AdBd
агч/AdBd
шатаһач/AdBd
агробиологч/AdBd
агрономч/AdBd
агсмч/AdBd
агтч/AdBd
адуч/AdBd
аҗарач/AdBd
аҗглач/AdBd
аҗглгч/AdBd
шатрч/AdBd
аҗлач/AdBd
акадлач/AdBd
алач/AdBd
алгч/AdBd
алңтргч/AdBd
алңтулгч/AdBd
амдач/AdBd
артельч/AdBd
алтч/AdBd
анатомч/AdBd
антропологч/AdBd
анч/AdBd
аңһуч/AdBd
аңч/AdBd
аптекч/AdBd
арвдгч/AdBd
арматурч/AdBd
армч/AdBd
арнҗлач/AdBd
арсмч/AdBd
арсч/AdBd
арсч-көрсч/AdBd
артиллерч/AdBd
археологч/AdBd
архивч/AdBd
арчач/AdBd
асрач/AdBd
асрулач/AdBd
астрономч/AdBd
асфальтч/AdBd
ачлач/AdBd
атавч/AdBd
атаклач/AdBd
атархгч/AdBd
атомч/AdBd
ахлач/AdBd
ахлачлгч/AdBd
ахлгч/AdBd
ахулач/AdBd
ахуч/AdBd
ач/AdBd
ачач/AdBd
ашлгч/AdBd
аюч/AdBd
бадарч/AdBd
бадрулгч/AdBd
бактериологч/AdBd
балтч/AdBd
бандурч/AdBd
бардмч/AdBd
барлач/AdBd
баруч/AdBd
басмач/AdBd
батлач/AdBd
бач/AdBd
баянч/AdBd
бодач/AdBd
бодгч/AdBd
боксч/AdBd
бомбдач/AdBd
ботаникч/AdBd
будач/AdBd
будгач/AdBd
будгч/AdBd
буйнч/AdBd
булагч/AdBd
булалдач/AdBd
булаһач/AdBd
булхач/AdBd
буһшч/AdBd
бурач/AdBd
бурмч/AdBd
бурһудач/AdBd
бурушагч/AdBd
бурхч/AdBd
буургч/AdBd
буцач/AdBd
бууч/AdBd
буфетч/AdBd
газетч/AdBd
дамшач/AdBd
даалһач/AdBd
дааһач/AdBd
давслач/AdBd
давталач/AdBd
домч/AdBd
дадмгшач/AdBd
даҗглач/AdBd
даҗглгч/AdBd
даҗрач/AdBd
даҗргч/AdBd
даҗрулгч/AdBd
далач/AdBd
далвлзгч/AdBd
далвч/AdBd
далдгч/AdBd
далдлач/AdBd
далч/AdBd
дамбрлач/AdBd
дамбрч/AdBd
дамҗулач/AdBd
дамҗурч/AdBd
дарасч/AdBd
дарвч/AdBd
даргдгч/AdBd
даргч/AdBd
дасхач/AdBd
дахач/AdBd
дахгч/AdBd
дахулач/AdBd
дахулгч/AdBd
даянч/AdBd
довтлгч/AdBd
догдлгч/AdBd
догдлулгч/AdBd
докъялч/AdBd
доладгч/AdBd
домбрч/AdBd
домгч/AdBd
дошач/AdBd
дуңгч/AdBd
дуудгч/AdBd
дууч/AdBd
җаңһрч/AdBd
җолач/AdBd
зааврч/AdBd
заагч/AdBd
зааһач/AdBd
задлач/AdBd
задлһч/AdBd
задч/AdBd
закальч/AdBd
закгч/AdBd
закрач/AdBd
залач/AdBd
залгч/AdBd
залһмҗлач/AdBd
заманч/AdBd
залурч/AdBd
залхуч/AdBd
замч/AdBd
занч/AdBd
заһсч/AdBd
заратргч/AdBd
зарлач/AdBd
зарһч/AdBd
засглач/AdBd
заягч/AdBd
зоотехникч/AdBd
зодач/AdBd
зодлдач/AdBd
зокъялч/AdBd
зоологч/AdBd
зурһадгч/AdBd
зуралч/AdBd
зураслач/AdBd
зурач/AdBd
зурхач/AdBd
зуткәч/AdBd
зуудгч/AdBd
зуульч/AdBd
зууһач/AdBd
шовуч/AdBd
мухлач/AdBd
зууршалгч/AdBd
шогч/AdBd
йовгч/AdBd
йовулач/AdBd
йорлгч/AdBd
йорч/AdBd
йослгч/AdBd
калибрч/AdBd
канцелярч/AdBd
каңгч/AdBd
каракульч/AdBd
карикатурч/AdBd
шоңхрч/AdBd
шоодгч/AdBd
колбасч/AdBd
командлгч/AdBd
комбайнч/AdBd
конькич/AdBd
шорнч/AdBd
штукатурч/AdBd
штурвальч/AdBd
штурмч/AdBd
лабораторч/AdBd
лавкч/AdBd
лыжч/AdBd
магтач/AdBd
малтач/AdBd
машич/AdBd
малч/AdBd
манач/AdBd
манулч/AdBd
маңнавч/AdBd
маңнач/AdBd
марһач/AdBd
математикч/AdBd
махлач/AdBd
махч/AdBd
модч/AdBd
моңһолч/AdBd
моторч/AdBd
муутхач/AdBd
мухлалгч/AdBd
наадач/AdBd
наач/AdBd
найдгч/AdBd
налуч/AdBd
намч/AdBd
нареч/AdBd
нойлгч/AdBd
нойрхгч/AdBd
ноолдач/AdBd
нохач/AdBd
һалч/AdBd
нурһвч/AdBd
нуувч/AdBd
нууц-нууч/AdBd
һадрлач/AdBd
һахач/AdBd
һазрч/AdBd
һазрчлач/AdBd
һаңнач/AdBd
һаңняч/AdBd
һардач/AdBd
һардгч/AdBd
һармульч/AdBd
һатлһач/AdBd
һацач/AdBd
һолһалгч/AdBd
һоһцавч/AdBd
һосч/AdBd
һохч/AdBd
һувшач/AdBd
һуңняч/AdBd
һурвдгч/AdBd
һутагч/AdBd
һуульһнч/AdBd
һуч/AdBd
һучдгч/AdBd
одч/AdBd
олзч/AdBd
омгшагч/AdBd
омрувч/AdBd
оновч/AdBd
онолч/AdBd
онч/AdBd
ооч/AdBd
шунмһач/AdBd
оргч/AdBd
орлцач/AdBd
отрч/AdBd
орһнч/AdBd
орулгч/AdBd
орч/AdBd
орчулач/AdBd
оршаһач/AdBd
отч/AdBd
палеонтолгч/AdBd
парч/AdBd
политикч/AdBd
пулеметч/AdBd
радиотехникч/AdBd
саальч/AdBd
саатулач/AdBd
садч/AdBd
саглгч/AdBd
сайдгч/AdBd
салавч/AdBd
салч/AdBd
сальквч/AdBd
сангч/AdBd
сантехникч/AdBd
саңнавч/AdBd
сарвч/AdBd
соңсач/AdBd
солһач/AdBd
социологч/AdBd
соңсгдгч/AdBd
соргч/AdBd
статистикч/AdBd
стратегч/AdBd
сулдхагч/AdBd
суңһач/AdBd
суңһгдгч/AdBd
суңһугч/AdBd
сургч/AdBd
сурһач/AdBd
сурһгч/AdBd
сурһмҗлач/AdBd
сурһульч/AdBd
тааһач/AdBd
табельч/AdBd
тавдгч/AdBd
тавлач/AdBd
тагтч/AdBd
тамһч/AdBd
тактикч/AdBd
талмшч/AdBd
тамлагч/AdBd
таңһч/AdBd
тархагч/AdBd
тарч/AdBd
тасчач/AdBd
татврч/AdBd
татгч/AdBd
татурч/AdBd
тахлач/AdBd
товч/AdBd
товчлгч/AdBd
товшурч/AdBd
тогтнулгч/AdBd
толһалгч/AdBd
толһач/AdBd
тонач/AdBd
тонулч/AdBd
тоолврч/AdBd
тоолгч/AdBd
тоонч/AdBd
тооч/AdBd
топографч/AdBd
торһч/AdBd
торпедч/AdBd
тослач/AdBd
тосулч/AdBd
тосхач/AdBd
чолуч/AdBd
тохавч/AdBd
тракторч/AdBd
тугч/AdBd
тулурч/AdBd
туһлч/AdBd
турвач/AdBd
туршулч/AdBd
туслгч/AdBd
тууҗлгч/AdBd
тууҗч/AdBd
туульч/AdBd
тюркологч/AdBd
увәлч/AdBd
удрдач/AdBd
уйюлач/AdBd
уйяч/AdBd
улач/AdBd
улвч/AdBd
умшач/AdBd
чуурсач/AdBd
урвгч/AdBd
усчач/AdBd
услач/AdBd
утач/AdBd
ууч/AdBd
уч/AdBd
фабрикч/AdBd
фольклорч/AdBd
хаалһч/AdBd
хадач/AdBd
хазлач/AdBd
хайгч/AdBd
халулач/AdBd
халурхгч/AdBd
халхвч/AdBd
хальмгч/AdBd
хамцулгч/AdBd
харач/AdBd
хармч/AdBd
харсач/AdBd
харулч/AdBd
харшлач/AdBd
хасвч/AdBd
хасулгч/AdBd
хатуч/AdBd
ховч/AdBd
хоңһч/AdBd
холвгч/AdBd
хорлгч/AdBd
хомнач/AdBd
хорлач/AdBd
хордагч/AdBd
шагч/AdBd
хурцлач/AdBd
хувагч/AdBd
хулдач/AdBd
хулхвч/AdBd
хурвч/AdBd
шалһач/AdBd
шалһч/AdBd
хуульч/AdBd
хуцач/AdBd
цокгч/AdBd
цуглулгч/AdBd
цуунгч/AdBd
чанач/AdBd
часч/AdBd
яллач/AdBd
ямач/AdBd
ясгч/AdBd
